Colorado statutes. TITLE 36 Natural Resources - General
ARTICLE 4
RECLAMATION OF STATE LANDS

Section

36-4-101. Water rights for state lands.

For the purpose of furnishing water and securing water rights for state lands, the state board of land commissioners is authorized to enter into contracts with any person, corporation, or irrigation district, providing for such irrigation, and to petition all such lands into irrigation districts at the time of or after the formation of such districts.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 211, § 1.

C.L.

§ 1190.

CSA:

C. 134, § 89.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-1.

Cross references:

For drainage of state lands, see article 30 of title 37; for inclusion of college and school lands in irrigation districts, see § 37-43-112.

36-4-102. Water tax - assessment.

In case of any such land so petitioned into any irrigation district, the state board of land commissioners shall be considered in all respects as a freeholder, so long as said land remains unsold, but as soon as any of such land is sold, whether occurring prior or after the time such land is petitioned into any such irrigation district, the purchaser shall from the time of his purchase be considered as such freeholder and entitled to all the rights of a freeholder, whether or not he has completed his payments to the state board of land commissioners. In no case shall any interest or title of the state be made liable or subjected to any claim for any water tax, water assessment, or water charge by reason of the including of any of such state land in any irrigation district. All assessments or other payments for the cost of irrigating any such state land shall be paid by the lessees or purchasers thereof. In case of any lease or sale, the lessee or purchaser shall pay to the register on or before March 1 of each year, in addition to his rental or amount due on his contract of purchase, as the case may be, such an additional amount as will equal the district assessment for an equal amount of land within the district or such greater amount as the board may require, and the register shall pay such additional amounts to the proper officer authorized by law to receive payment of assessments within such district to apply on the cost of furnishing water for such state land. When the title to any such state land passes from the state, the unpaid balance of the cost of furnishing water for the same shall at once become due and payable and attach as a lien thereon and be collected as an assessment of such irrigation district, in the same manner as assessments on other lands in the district.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 211, § 2.

C.L.

§ 1191.

CSA:

C. 134, § 90.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-2.

Cross references:

For irrigation district assessments, see § 37-41-124.

36-4-103. Payment by lessee or purchaser.

In order to provide payment for such water rights for state lands, the state board of land commissioners may agree that, when any state land for which irrigation is provided is leased or sold, the lessee or purchaser, as the case may be, shall pay the agreed value therefor, at such times and in such amounts and in such proportion as may be agreed upon by the state board of land commissioners. The state board of land commissioners has power to secure, to any such person, corporation, or irrigation district so furnishing water for the irrigation of state lands, the payment of the cost of such water rights upon such lands being leased or sold by the lessee or purchaser thereof. In no case shall the state board of land commissioners have any power to use any of the school fund, either principal or interest, for any such purpose.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 212, § 3.

C.L.

§ 1192.

CSA:

C. 134, § 91.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-3.

36-4-104. Board may improve state land.

The state board of land commissioners is authorized to take, on behalf of and in the name of the state, as speedily as practicable, such action as may, in the judgment of the board, be necessary or desirable to irrigate and improve such lands belonging to the state, and lying in the San Luis valley and elsewhere, as may in the judgment of the board be susceptible of improvement by irrigation.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 588, § 1.

C.L.

§ 1193.

CSA:

C. 134, § 92.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-4.

36-4-105. Water rights acquired - how.

Such action may be taken by initiating such water rights and systems for reservoirs, canals, and conduits, or by the purchase of existing water rights, systems for reservoirs, canals, and conduits, or an interest therein, including pumping plants, highways, and such other accessories as may, in the judgment of the board, be necessary or desirable to the successful accomplishment of the objects of sections 36-4-104 to 36-4-112.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 588, § 2.

C.L.

§ 1194.

CSA:

C. 134, § 93.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-5.

36-4-106. Board may proceed - how.

In furtherance of such objects the board shall proceed in accordance with the irrigation laws of the state, insofar as the same are applicable, and may, if it elects, also proceed under the laws of the United States relating to the acquisition of such rights or easements over the public lands of the United States.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 588, § 3.

C.L.

§ 1195.

CSA:

C. 134, § 94.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-6.

36-4-107. Departmental decisions.

In case such procedure, or any part thereof, is under the laws of the United States, the board shall not be bound or required to accept or concur in the action or decision, or failure or delay in action or decision of any departmental or other officer, agent, or employee of the United States, if in the judgment of the board the same is not in good faith, or is for the mere purpose of delay, or is adverse to the legal, constitutional, or inherent rights of the state; nor shall the board, in any event, accept or concur in any such action, decision, grant, or permit which is, or purports to be, revocable by the United States or by any departmental or other officer, agent, or employee of the United States at its discretion or without reasonable cause and opportunity to be heard.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 589, § 4.

C.L.

§ 1196.

CSA:

C. 134, § 95.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-7.

36-4-108. Power of eminent domain.

In case of such procedure under the laws of the United States and in the event that any departmental or other officer, agent, or employee of the United States shall, in the judgment of the board, fail or refuse to act or decide within a reasonable time, or in bad faith, or for mere purpose of delay, or act or decide adversely to the legal, constitutional, or inherent rights of the state, upon any question involved and subject to his action or decision or shall obstruct, hinder, or interfere with the necessary occupancy or possession of the lands involved by the state, or any of its agents or employees, the board shall at once proceed to acquire the desired rights or easements, occupancy, or possession by invoking the power of eminent domain of the state. Such proceedings, including the right to enter upon the lands involved for the purpose of examination and survey, and the right of possession during the pendency of the action, and in all other respects, shall be as provided in articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S., in relation to eminent domain insofar as applicable and as supplemented and enlarged by sections 36-4-104 to 36-4-112.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 589, § 5.

C.L.

§ 1197.

CSA:

C. 134, § 96.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-8.

Cross references:

For additional provisions concerning condemnation of public lands belonging to the United States, see article 3 of title 38.

36-4-109. Parties - process.

Such actions shall be brought in the name of the state as plaintiff, in the district court of any county in which the system of irrigation or any part thereof is located, or is to be located, and shall make as defendants thereto by proper name and official title, when known, such departmental and other officers, agents, and employees of the United States as have or claim to have jurisdiction, possession, charge, or control, or are exercising the same, over the lands involved or any part thereof, and such other officers, agents, and persons as the board may deem necessary or proper. The summons and other process shall be served and return made in the manner prescribed in articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S., or in any other manner required by the order of the court in the action.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 589, § 6.

C.L.

§ 1198.

CSA:

C. 134, § 97.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-9.

36-4-110. Interests vested in state.

Upon the completion of service and return of summons or other process and the expiration of the time required by law or the order of the court before whom the action is pending for the appearance of the defendants, such defendants and all interests of the United States in the lands involved shall be deemed to be in court and subject to its jurisdiction, and thereafter, such proceedings shall be had as are required by the laws of the state, so far as applicable and as supplemented and enlarged by the provisions of sections 36-4-104 to 36-4-112, and, if the judgment of the court is in favor of the state, it shall vest in the state the rights and easements so adjudged over all public lands of the United States so involved, whether the same are reserved or unreserved, or are withdrawn temporarily or permanently for any purpose whatever, except those held for strictly governmental purposes, the jurisdiction over which has been ceded by the state to the United States.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 590, § 7.

C.L.

§ 1199.

CSA:

C. 134, § 98.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-10.

36-4-111. Mandamus - injunction.

Nothing in sections 36-4-104 to 36-4-112 shall prevent the board or the state from proceeding in aid of the actions provided in said sections, or independently thereof, by mandamus, injunction, or other appropriate action, civil or criminal, to acquire irrigation rights and easements upon the public domain for the benefit of the state or its citizens or to protect and defend the same.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 590, § 8.

C.L.

§ 1200.

CSA:

C. 134, § 99.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-11.

36-4-112. Attorney general to enforce.

The attorney general of the state is directed to give prompt and special attention to the enforcement of sections 36-4-104 to 36-4-112 and shall, when so requested by the board, give advice and take such legal action as in his or her judgment is necessary or proper and may, if necessary, with the approval of the board and governor, employ not to exceed one lawyer or firm of lawyers to assist him or her in such legal action, but a retainer shall not be paid or other payment for such services made until after the services have been rendered or concurrently may be paid with the rendition of the services.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 590, § 9.

C.L.

§ 1201.

CSA:

C. 134, § 100.

CRS 53:

§ 112-4-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-4-12.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1094), ch. 94, p. 269, § 19, effective August 10.